Hawaii statutes.
§286-56 Official cars. All motor
vehicles owned by any foreign government or by a consul or other official
representative thereof, or by the United States government, or by the State or
any political subdivision thereof, shall be registered as herein required by
the person having the custody thereof, and the custodian shall display official
registration by distinguishing marks thereon which shall be furnished by the
director of finance, free of charge, and where motor vehicles are owned by the
State or any of its municipal subdivisions, the motor vehicle shall bear the
inscription provided for in sections 105-6 to 105-8. [L 1929, c 197, §14; RL
1935, §2675; RL 1945, §7346; RL 1955, §160-14; HRS §286-56; am L 1986, c 339,
§30; am L 2008, c 16, §11]

Revision Note

"Director of finance" substituted for
"treasurer" to conform to county charters.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next